Mississippi, session 2026, HB1420.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Title. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Spring-Step Teacher Pay Bridge Act". SECTION 2.  Purpose. The purpose of this act is to ensure financial stability for licensed teachers and instructional staff by providing a predictable, annual Spring-Step Pay Bridge on January 7 of each year for five (5) consecutive years following a teacher's return from the Christmas break.  This payment is designed to close the six-week compensation gap that occurs between December and late January payroll cycles. SECTION 3.  Definitions. As used in this act, the following terms shall be defined as provided in this section: (a) "Department" means the State Department of Education. (b) "Teacher" means any licensed educator employed full-time by a public school district in the State of Mississippi. (c) "Instructional staff" includes assistant teachers, interventionists, librarians, counselors, and other personnel directly supporting instruction. (d)  "Spring-Step Pay Bridge" means the annual supplemental payment established under this act. (e)  "Return after the Christmas break" means the first contract day on which teachers resume duties following the district's winter holiday closure. SECTION 4.  Establishment of Spring-Step Pay Bridge.  (1)  Beginning January 7 of the first fiscal year following the effective date of this act, and continuing for five (5) consecutive years, each eligible teacher and instructional staff member shall receive a Spring-Step Pay Bridge payment. (2)  The payment shall be issued no later than January 7 of each year. (3)  The payment shall be automatic, requiring no additional application or verification from the employee beyond confirmation of active employment. SECTION 5.  Payment structure.  (1)  The Spring-Step Pay Bridge shall be calculated as one-half (1/2) of the employee's regular biweekly pay, or a fixed amount established annually by the department based on available appropriations, whichever is greater. (2)  The payment shall be treated as supplemental income, subject to standard payroll withholdings. (3)  The payment shall not reduce, replace, or interfere with any step increases, raises, or supplements otherwise due to the employee. SECTION 6.  Eligibility. To qualify for the Spring-Step Pay Bridge, an employee must: (a)  Be employed full-time by a Mississippi public school district; (b)  Hold a valid Mississippi educator license or serve in an instructional support role; (c)  Return to work on the first contract day after the Christmas break; and (d)  Remain employed through January 7 of the payment year. SECTION 7.  Funding and appropriations.  (1)  The Legislature shall appropriate funds annually to the department for the purpose of administering the Spring-Step Pay Bridge. (2)  Funds shall be distributed to school districts through the Mississippi Student Funding Formula or a designated supplemental line item. (3)  School districts shall remit payments to employees using standard payroll processes. SECTION 8.  Protections and nonpenalty clause.  (1)  No school district shall be penalized in accountability ratings, audits, or compliance reviews for issuing the Spring-Step Pay Bridge. (2)  The payment shall not be considered a bonus for the purposes of retirement calculations unless otherwise authorized by the Public Employees' Retirement System (PERS). SECTION 9.  Reporting and review.  (1)  The department shall submit an annual report to the Legislature summarizing: (a)  Number of employees receiving the payment; (b)  Total cost; and (c)  Impact on teacher retention and financial stability. (2)  After five (5) years from the effective date of this act, the Legislature shall review the program for continuation, expansion, or permanent adoption. SECTION 10.  Section 37-19-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-19-7.  (1) Teachers' salaries in each public school district shall be determined and paid in accordance with the scale for teachers' salaries as provided in this subsection.  For teachers holding the following types of licenses or the equivalent as determined by the State Board of Education, and the following number of years of teaching experience, the scale shall be as follows: 2022-2023 AND SUBSEQUENT SCHOOL YEARS MINIMUM SALARY SCHEDULE Exp.     AAAA AAA            AA              A 0   45,500.00 44,000.00      43,000.00      41,500.00 1   46,100.00 44,550.00      43,525.00      41,900.00 2   46,700.00 45,100.00      44,050.00      42,300.00 3   47,300.00 45,650.00      44,575.00      42,700.00 4   47,900.00      46,200.00 45,100.00      43,100.00 5   49,250.00 47,500.00      46,350.00      44,300.00 6   49,850.00 48,050.00      46,875.00      44,700.00 7   50,450.00 48,600.00      47,400.00      45,100.00 8   51,050.00      49,150.00 47,925.00      45,500.00 9   51,650.00 49,700.00      48,450.00      45,900.00 10   53,000.00 51,000.00      49,700.00      47,100.00 11   53,600.00 51,550.00      50,225.00      47,500.00 12   54,200.00      52,100.00 50,750.00      47,900.00 13   54,800.00 52,650.00      51,275.00      48,300.00 14   55,400.00 53,200.00      51,800.00      48,700.00 15   56,750.00 54,500.00      53,050.00      49,900.00 16   57,350.00      55,050.00 53,575.00      50,300.00 17   57,950.00 55,600.00      54,100.00      50,700.00 18   58,550.00 56,150.00      54,625.00      51,100.00 19   59,150.00 56,700.00      55,150.00      51,500.00 20   60,500.00 58,000.00      56,400.00      52,700.00 21   61,100.00 58,550.00      56,925.00      53,100.00 22   61,700.00 59,100.00      57,450.00      53,500.00 23   62,300.00 59,650.00      57,975.00      53,900.00 24   62,900.00 60,200.00      58,500.00      54,300.00 25   65,400.00 62,700.00      61,000.00      56,800.00 26   66,000.00 63,250.00      61,525.00      57,200.00 27   66,600.00 63,800.00      62,050.00      57,600.00 28   67,200.00 64,350.00      62,575.00      58,000.00 29   67,800.00 64,900.00      63,100.00      58,400.00 30   68,400.00 65,450.00      63,625.00      58,800.00 31   69,000.00 66,000.00      64,150.00      59,200.00 32   69,600.00 66,550.00      64,675.00      59,600.00 33   70,200.00 67,100.00      65,200.00      60,000.00 34   70,800.00 67,650.00      65,725.00      60,400.00 35 & above 71,400.00 68,200.00      66,250.00      60,800.00 2024-2025 AND SUBSEQUENT SCHOOL YEARS MINIMUM SALARY SCHEDULE The school district, with assistance from the Department of Education, shall consider the teacher's years of service and license type and determine the corresponding salary for the retired teacher.  After determining the retired teacher's corresponding salary, the school district may allocate up to one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the amount provided under the salary schedule for such teacher, as applicable, as salary and assessment under the program. After determining the retired teacher's salary, the school district may pay no more than fifty percent (50%) of the retired teacher's compensation as salary to the retired teacher.  The remaining fifty percent (50%) of the retired teacher's compensation as salary shall be paid by the school district to PERS as a pension liability participation assessment. It is the intent of the Legislature that any state funds made available for salaries of licensed personnel in excess of the funds paid for such salaries for the 1986-1987 school year shall be paid to licensed personnel pursuant to a personnel appraisal and compensation system implemented by the State Board of Education. The State Board of Education shall have the authority to adopt and amend rules and regulations as are necessary to establish, administer and maintain the system. All teachers employed on a full-time basis shall be paid a minimum salary in accordance with the above scale.  However, no school district shall receive any funds under this section for any school year during which the local supplement paid to any individual teacher shall have been reduced to a sum less than that paid to that individual teacher for performing the same duties from local supplement during the immediately preceding school year.  The amount actually spent for the purposes of group health and/or life insurance shall be considered as a part of the aggregate amount of local supplement but shall not be considered a part of the amount of individual local supplement. The level of professional training of each teacher to be used in establishing the salary for the teacher for each year shall be determined by the type of valid teacher's license issued to that teacher on or before October 1 of the current school year. However, school districts are authorized, in their discretion, to negotiate the salary levels applicable to licensed employees who are receiving retirement benefits from the retirement system of another state. (2)  (a)  The following employees shall receive an annual salary supplement in the amount of Six Thousand Dollars ($6,000.00), plus fringe benefits, in addition to any other compensation to which the employee may be entitled: (i)  Any licensed teacher or retired teacher employed by a school district under the authority of Section 25-11-126 who has met the requirements and acquired a Master Teacher certificate from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards and who is employed by a local school board or the State Board of Education as a teacher and not as an administrator.  Such teacher shall submit documentation to the State Department of Education that the certificate was received prior to October 15 in order to be eligible for the full salary supplement in the current school year, or the teacher shall submit such documentation to the State Department of Education prior to February 15 in order to be eligible for a prorated salary supplement beginning with the second term of the school year. (ii)  A licensed nurse who has met the requirements and acquired a certificate from the National Board for Certification of School Nurses, Inc., and who is employed by a local school board or the State Board of Education as a school nurse and not as an administrator.  The licensed school nurse shall submit documentation to the State Department of Education that the certificate was received before October 15 in order to be eligible for the full salary supplement in the current school year, or the licensed school nurse shall submit the documentation to the State Department of Education before February 15 in order to be eligible for a prorated salary supplement beginning with the second term of the school year. (iii)  Any licensed school counselor who has met the requirements and acquired a National Certified School Counselor (NCSC) endorsement from the National Board of Certified Counselors and who is employed by a local school board or the State Board of Education as a counselor and not as an administrator.  Such licensed school counselor shall submit documentation to the State Department of Education that the endorsement was received prior to October 15 in order to be eligible for the full salary supplement in the current school year, or the licensed school counselor shall submit such documentation to the State Department of Education prior to February 15 in order to be eligible for a prorated salary supplement beginning with the second term of the school year.  However, any school counselor who started the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards process for school counselors between June 1, 2003, and June 30, 2004, and completes the requirements and acquires the Master Teacher certificate shall be entitled to the master teacher supplement, and those counselors who complete the process shall be entitled to a one-time reimbursement for the actual cost of the process as outlined in paragraph (b) of this subsection. (iv)  Any licensed speech-language pathologist and audiologist who has met the requirements and acquired a Certificate of Clinical Competence from the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association and any certified academic language therapist (CALT) who has met the certification requirements of the Academic Language Therapy Association and who is employed by a local school board.  The licensed speech-language pathologist and audiologist and certified academic language therapist shall submit documentation to the State Department of Education that the certificate or endorsement was received before October 15 in order to be eligible for the full salary supplement in the current school year, or the licensed speech-language pathologist and audiologist and certified academic language therapist shall submit the documentation to the State Department of Education before February 15 in order to be eligible for a prorated salary supplement beginning with the second term of the school year. (v)  Any licensed athletic trainer who has met the requirements and acquired Board Certification for the Athletic Trainer from the Board of Certification, Inc., and who is employed by a local school board or the State Board of Education as an athletic trainer and not as an administrator.  The licensed athletic trainer shall submit documentation to the State Department of Education that the certificate was received before October 15 in order to be eligible for the full salary supplement in the current school year, or the licensed athletic trainer shall submit the documentation to the State Department of Education before February 15 in order to be eligible for a prorated salary supplement beginning with the second term of the school year. (b)  An employee shall be reimbursed for the actual cost of completing each component of acquiring the certificate or endorsement, excluding any costs incurred for postgraduate courses, not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for each component, not to exceed four (4) components, for a teacher, school counselor or speech-language pathologist and audiologist, regardless of whether or not the process resulted in the award of the certificate or endorsement.  A local school district or any private individual or entity may pay the cost of completing the process of acquiring the certificate or endorsement for any employee of the school district described under paragraph (a), and the State Department of Education shall reimburse the school district for such cost, regardless of whether or not the process resulted in the award of the certificate or endorsement.  If a private individual or entity has paid the cost of completing the process of acquiring the certificate or endorsement for an employee, the local school district may agree to directly reimburse the individual or entity for such cost on behalf of the employee. (c)  All salary supplements, fringe benefits and process reimbursement authorized under this subsection shall be paid directly by the State Department of Education to the local school district and shall be in addition to its allotments from the total funding formula provided in Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215 and not a part thereof in accordance with regulations promulgated by the State Board of Education.  Local school districts shall not reduce the local supplement paid to any employee receiving such salary supplement, and the employee shall receive any local supplement to which employees with similar training and experience otherwise are entitled.  However, an educational employee shall receive the salary supplement in the amount of Six Thousand Dollars ($6,000.00) for only one (1) of the qualifying certifications authorized under paragraph (a) of this subsection.  No school district shall provide more than one (1) annual salary supplement under the provisions of this subsection to any one (1) individual employee holding multiple qualifying national certifications. (d)  If an employee for whom such cost has been paid, in full or in part, by a local school district or private individual or entity fails to complete the certification or endorsement process, the employee shall be liable to the school district or individual or entity for all amounts paid by the school district or individual or entity on behalf of that employee toward his or her certificate or endorsement. (3)  The following employees shall receive an annual salary supplement in the amount of Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00), plus fringe benefits, in addition to any other compensation to which the employee may be entitled: Effective July 1, 2016, if funds are available for that purpose, any licensed teacher or retired teacher employed by a local school district under the authority of Section 25-11-126 who has met the requirements and acquired a Master Teacher Certificate from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards and who is employed in a public school district located in one (1) of the following counties: Claiborne, Adams, Jefferson, Wilkinson, Amite, Bolivar, Coahoma, Leflore, Quitman, Sharkey, Issaquena, Sunflower, Washington, Holmes, Yazoo and Tallahatchie.  The salary supplement awarded under the provisions of this subsection (3) shall be in addition to the salary supplement awarded under the provisions of subsection (2) of this section. Teachers who meet the qualifications for a salary supplement under this subsection (3) who are assigned for less than one (1) full year or less than full time for the school year shall receive the salary supplement in a prorated manner, with the portion of the teacher's assignment to the critical geographic area to be determined as of June 15th of the school year. (4)  (a)  This subsection shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Performance-Based Pay (MPBP)" plan.  In addition to the minimum base pay described in this section, only if funds are available for that purpose, the State of Mississippi may provide monies from state funds to school districts for the purposes of rewarding licensed teachers, administrators and nonlicensed personnel at individual schools showing improvement in student test scores.  The MPBP plan shall be developed by the State Department of Education based on the following criteria: (i)  It is the express intent of this legislation that the MPBP plan shall utilize only existing standards of accreditation and assessment as established by the State Board of Education. (ii)  To ensure that all of Mississippi's teachers, administrators and nonlicensed personnel at all schools have equal access to the monies set aside in this section, the MPBP program shall be designed to calculate each school's performance as determined by the school's increase in scores from the prior school year.  The MPBP program shall be based on a standardized scores rating where all levels of schools can be judged in a statistically fair and reasonable way upon implementation.  At the end of each year, after all student achievement scores have been standardized, the State Department of Education shall implement the MPBP plan. (iii)  To ensure all teachers cooperate in the spirit of teamwork, individual schools shall submit a plan to the local school district to be approved before the beginning of each school year.  The plan shall include, but not be limited to, how all teachers, regardless of subject area, and administrators will be responsible for improving student achievement for their individual school. (b)  The State Board of Education shall develop the processes and procedures for designating schools eligible to participate in the MPBP.  State assessment results, growth in student achievement at individual schools and other measures deemed appropriate in designating successful student achievement shall be used in establishing MPBP criteria. (5)  (a)  If funds are available for that purpose, each school in Mississippi shall have mentor teachers, as defined by Sections 37-9-201 through 37-9-213, who shall receive additional base compensation provided for by the State Legislature in the amount of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per each beginning teacher that is being mentored.  The additional state compensation shall be limited to those mentor teachers that provide mentoring services to beginning teachers.  For the purposes of such funding, a beginning teacher shall be defined as any teacher in any school in Mississippi that has less than one (1) year of classroom experience teaching in a public school.  For the purposes of such funding, no full-time academic teacher shall mentor more than two (2) beginning teachers. (b)  To be eligible for this state funding, the individual school must have a classroom management program approved by the local school board. (6)  Effective with the 2014-2015 school year, the school districts participating in the Pilot Performance-Based Compensation System pursuant to Section 37-19-9 may award additional teacher and administrator pay based thereon. SECTION 11.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall apply to the next immediate January 7 payment cycle.